New Jersey, session 222, A312.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Defend Our Educational Resources Act. 2.    The Governor, in consultation with the Commissioner of Education, shall take measures necessary to protect the educational resources of the State from interference by the federal government of the United States, which measures shall include, but not be limited to: a.     challenging federal action aimed at limiting the States constitutionally protected authority to govern in the area of education; b.    challenging the United States Supreme Courts decision in Plyler v. Doe, 457 U.S. 202 (1982) when the opportunity arises and supporting other states efforts to challenge the decision; and c.     supporting local efforts to preserve educational resources for citizens of the United States. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.